New York, session 2025-2026, A2361.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The navigation law is amended by adding a new section 35-e 2 to read as follows: 3 § 35-e. Life preservers at public boat launches. 1. Notwithstanding 4 any contrary provision of this chapter or of any other law, it shall be 5 the duty of the owners of every public launch in this state to maintain 6 on each such premises at least one ring buoy or life preserver, with 7 quarter-inch line, not less than five hundred feet in length, with suit- 8 able reel attached thereto. In addition thereto, there shall be anchored 9 on the shore, a suitable reel with a half-inch line not less than five 10 hundred feet in length, with a life-belt attached thereto, kept in good 11 order and proper condition, so that it can readily be used by those 12 assisting in saving life. 13 2. The commissioner of parks, recreation and historic preservation 14 shall promulgate such rules and regulations as he or she deems necessary 15 to enforce the provisions of this section. 16 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 17 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment 18 and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation 19 of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 20 completed on or before such date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05834-01-5